Utah statutes.
78B-6-1309.   Order for entry -- Liability for injuries.

The order shall describe the property, and a copy served on the owner or occupant.  The party may enter the property with necessary surveyors and assistants, and may take surveys and measurements.  The party shall be liable for any unnecessary injury done to the property.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

